Illinois, session 104th, SB3621.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-40 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/3-40)7    Sec. 3-40. Compensation of supervisors of assessments. 8    (a) A supervisor of assessments shall receive annual 9compensation in an amount fixed by the county board subject to 10the following minimum amounts: 11        In counties with less than 14,000 inhabitants, not 12    less than $7,500; 13        In counties with 14,000 or more but less than 30,000 14    inhabitants, not less than $8,000; 15        In counties with 30,000 or more but less than 60,000 16    inhabitants, not less than $9,000; 17        In counties with 60,000 or more but less than 100,000 18    inhabitants, not less than $10,000; 19        In counties with 100,000 or more but less than 200,000 20    inhabitants, not less than $11,500; 21        In counties with 200,000 or more but less than 300,000 22    inhabitants, not less than $13,000; 23        In counties with 300,000 or more but less than   SB3621- 2 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1    1,000,000 inhabitants, not less than $15,000.2For purposes of this subsection, the number of inhabitants 3shall be determined by the latest Federal decennial or special 4census of the county.5    (b) Elected supervisors of assessments who began a term of 6office before December 1, 1990 shall be compensated at the 7rate of their base salary. "Base salary" is the compensation 8paid for their position before July 1, 1989.9    (c) Elected supervisors of assessments beginning a term of 10office on or after December 1, 1990 shall, beginning December 111, 1993, receive their base salary plus at least 12% of base 12salary. Elected and appointed supervisors of assessments who 13began a term of office on or after December 1, 2026, beginning 14December 1, 2029 shall be paid a salary in an amount equal to 1580% of the amount paid to the State's Attorney of the county 16that employs the elected or appointed supervisor of 17assessments. 18    Any supervisor of assessments who has been presented a 19Certified Assessing Evaluator Certificate by the International 20Association of Assessing Officers shall receive an additional 21compensation of $500 per year to be paid out of funds 22appropriated to the Department from the Personal Property Tax 23Replacement Fund.24    The salary set by the county board shall be paid in equal 25monthly installments out of the treasury of the county in 26which he or she is appointed or elected. If the Department has   SB3621- 3 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1determined that the total assessed value of property in a 2county, as equalized by the supervisor of assessments under 3Section 9-210, is between 31 1/3% and 35 1/3% of the total fair 4cash value of property in the county, subject to 5appropriation, the Department shall reimburse the county 6monthly from the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund or the 7General Revenue Fund 50% of the amount of salary the county 8paid to the officer for the preceding month, until November 930, 2026, and 66 2/3% of the amount of salary the county paid 10to the officer for the preceding month beginning December 1, 112026.12    The county board shall provide necessary office space for 13the officer and pay all necessary expenses of the office out of 14the county treasury.15    Each supervisor of assessments may, with the advice and 16consent of the county board, appoint necessary deputies and 17clerks, their compensation to be fixed by the county board and 18paid by the county.19(Source: P.A. 97-72, eff. 7-1-11.) 20    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 21Sections 4-6001 and 4-6002 and by adding Sections 4-6005 and 224-8003 as follows: 23    (55 ILCS 5/4-6001)  (from Ch. 34, par. 4-6001)24    Sec. 4-6001. Officers in counties of less than 2,000,000.   SB3621- 4 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1    (a) In all counties of less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, 2the compensation of Coroners, County Treasurers, County 3Clerks, Recorders and Auditors shall be determined under this 4Section until November 30, 2026. The County Board in those 5counties shall fix the amount of the necessary clerk hire, 6stationery, fuel and other expenses of those officers. The 7compensation of those officers shall be separate from the 8necessary clerk hire, stationery, fuel and other expenses, and 9such compensation (except for coroners in those counties with 10less than 2,000,000 population in which the coroner's 11compensation is set in accordance with Section 4-6002) shall 12be fixed within the following limits:13    To each such officer in counties containing less than 1414,000 inhabitants, not less than $13,500 per annum.15    To each such officer in counties containing 14,000 or more 16inhabitants, but less than 30,000 inhabitants, not less than 17$14,500 per annum.18    To each such officer in counties containing 30,000 or more 19inhabitants but less than 60,000 inhabitants, not less than 20$15,000 per annum.21    To each such officer in counties containing 60,000 or more 22inhabitants but less than 100,000 inhabitants, not less than 23$15,000 per annum.24    To each such officer in counties containing 100,000 or 25more inhabitants but less than 200,000 inhabitants, not less 26than $16,500 per annum.  SB3621- 5 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1    To each such officer in counties containing 200,000 or 2more inhabitants but less than 300,000 inhabitants, not less 3than $18,000 per annum.4    To each such officer in counties containing 300,000 or 5more inhabitants but less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, not less 6than $20,000 per annum.7    (b) Those officers beginning a term of office before 8December 1, 1990 shall be compensated at the rate of their base 9salary. "Base salary" is the compensation paid for each of 10those offices, respectively, before July 1, 1989.11    (c) Those officers beginning a term of office on or after 12December 1, 1990 shall be compensated as follows:13        (1) Beginning December 1, 1990, base salary plus at 14    least 3% of base salary.15        (2) Beginning December 1, 1991, base salary plus at 16    least 6% of base salary.17        (3) Beginning December 1, 1992, base salary plus at 18    least 9% of base salary.19        (4) Beginning December 1, 1993, base salary plus at 20    least 12% of base salary.21    (d) In addition to but separate and apart from the 22compensation provided in this Section, the county clerk of 23each county, the recorder of each county, and the chief clerk 24of each county board of election commissioners shall receive 25an award as follows:26        (1) $4,500 per year after January 1, 1998;  SB3621- 6 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1        (2) $5,500 per year after January 1, 1999; and2        (3) $6,500 per year after January 1, 2000.3The total amount required for such awards each year shall be 4appropriated by the General Assembly to the State Board of 5Elections which shall distribute the awards in annual lump sum 6payments to the several county clerks, recorders, and chief 7election clerks. Beginning December 1, 1990, this annual 8award, and any other award or stipend paid out of State funds 9to county officers, shall not affect any other compensation 10provided by law to be paid to county officers.11    For State fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2024, 12the State Board of Elections shall remit to each county the 13amount required for the stipend under this subsection. That 14money shall be deposited by the county treasurer into a fund 15dedicated for that purpose. The county payroll clerk shall pay 16the stipend as required by this subsection within 10 business 17days after those funds are deposited into the county fund. The 18stipend shall not be considered part of the recipient's base 19compensation and must be remitted to the recipient in addition 20to the recipient's annual salary or compensation. Beginning 21July 1, 2024, the county shall be responsible for the State and 22federal income tax reporting and withholding as well as the 23employer contributions under the Illinois Pension Code on the 24stipend under this subsection. 25    (e) Beginning December 1, 1990, no county board may reduce 26or otherwise impair the compensation payable from county funds   SB3621- 7 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1to a county officer if the reduction or impairment is the 2result of the county officer receiving an award or stipend 3payable from State funds.4    (f) The compensation, necessary clerk hire, stationery, 5fuel and other expenses of the county auditor, as fixed by the 6county board, shall be paid by the county.7    (g) The population of all counties for the purpose of 8fixing compensation, as herein provided, shall be based upon 9the last Federal census immediately previous to the election 10of the officer in question in each county.11    (h) With respect to an auditor who takes office on or after 12the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General 13Assembly, the auditor shall receive an annual stipend of 14$6,500 per year. The General Assembly shall appropriate the 15total amount required for the stipend each year from the 16Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund to the Department of 17Revenue, and the Department of Revenue shall distribute the 18awards in an annual lump sum payment to each county auditor. 19The stipend shall be in addition to, but separate and apart 20from, the compensation provided in this Section. No county 21board may reduce or otherwise impair the compensation payable 22from county funds to the auditor if the reduction or 23impairment is the result of the auditor receiving an award or 24stipend pursuant to this subsection. 25    Except as provided under subsection (d), for State fiscal 26years beginning on or after July 1, 2023, the Department shall   SB3621- 8 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1remit to each county the amount required for the stipend under 2this Section. That money shall be deposited by the county 3treasurer into a fund dedicated for that purpose. The county 4payroll clerk shall pay the stipend to the auditor within 10 5business days after those funds are deposited into the county 6fund. The stipend shall not be considered part of the 7auditor's base compensation and must be remitted to the 8auditor in addition to the auditor's annual salary or 9compensation. Beginning July 1, 2023, the county shall be 10responsible for the State and federal income tax reporting and 11withholding as well as the employer contributions under the 12Illinois Pension Code on the stipend under this Section. 13(Source: P.A. 103-318, eff. 7-28-23; 103-607, eff. 7-1-24.) 14    (55 ILCS 5/4-6002)  (from Ch. 34, par. 4-6002)15    Sec. 4-6002. Coroners in counties of less than 2,000,000. 16    (a) Through November 30, 2026, the The County Board, in 17all counties of less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, shall fix the 18compensation of Coroners within the limitations fixed by this 19Division, and shall appropriate for their necessary clerk 20hire, stationery, fuel, supplies, and other expenses. The 21compensation of the Coroner shall be fixed separately from his 22necessary clerk hire, stationery, fuel and other expenses, and 23such compensation shall be fixed within the following limits:24    To each Coroner in counties containing less than 5,000 25inhabitants, not less than $4,500 per annum.  SB3621- 9 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1    To each Coroner in counties containing 5,000 or more 2inhabitants but less than 14,000 inhabitants, not less than 3$6,000 per annum.4    To each Coroner in counties containing 14,000 or more 5inhabitants, but less than 30,000 inhabitants, not less than 6$9,000 per annum.7    To each Coroner in counties containing 30,000 or more 8inhabitants, but less than 60,000 inhabitants, not less than 9$14,000 per annum.10    To each Coroner in counties containing 60,000 or more 11inhabitants, but less than 100,000 inhabitants, not less than 12$15,000 per annum.13    To each Coroner in counties containing 100,000 or more 14inhabitants, but less than 200,000 inhabitants, not less than 15$16,500 per annum.16    To each Coroner in counties containing 200,000 or more 17inhabitants, but less than 300,000 inhabitants, not less than 18$18,000 per annum.19    To each Coroner in counties containing 300,000 or more 20inhabitants, but less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, not less 21than $20,000 per annum.22    The population of all counties for the purpose of fixing 23compensation, as herein provided, shall be based upon the last 24Federal census immediately previous to the election of the 25Coroner in question in each county. This Section does not 26apply to a county which has abolished the elective office of   SB3621- 10 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1coroner.2    (b) Those coroners beginning a term of office on or after 3December 1, 1990 shall be compensated as follows:4        (1) Beginning December 1, 1990, base salary plus at 5    least 3% of base salary.6        (2) Beginning December 1, 1991, base salary plus at 7    least 6% of base salary.8        (3) Beginning December 1, 1992, base salary plus at 9    least 9% of base salary.10        (4) Beginning December 1, 1993, base salary plus at 11    least 12% of base salary.12    "Base salary", as used in this subsection (b), means the 13salary in effect before July 1, 1989.14    (c) In addition to, but separate and apart from, the 15compensation provided in this Section, subject to 16appropriation, the coroner of each county shall receive an 17annual stipend of $6,500 to be paid by the Illinois Department 18of Revenue out of the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund 19if his or her term begins on or after December 1, 2000.20    For State fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2023, 21the Department shall remit to each county the amount required 22for the stipend under this subsection. That money shall be 23deposited by the county treasurer into a fund dedicated for 24that purpose. The county payroll clerk shall pay the stipend 25to the coroner within 10 business days after those funds are 26deposited into the county fund. The stipend shall not be   SB3621- 11 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1considered part of the coroner's base compensation and must be 2remitted to the coroner in addition to the coroner's annual 3salary or compensation. Beginning July 1, 2023, the county 4shall be responsible for the State and federal income tax 5reporting and withholding as well as the employer 6contributions under the Illinois Pension Code on the stipend 7received under this subsection. 8(Source: P.A. 103-318, eff. 7-28-23.) 9    (55 ILCS 5/4-6005 new)10    Sec. 4-6005. Officers in counties with fewer than 112,000,000 inhabitants. 12    (a) Beginning December 1, 2026, the compensation of 13coroners, county treasurers, county clerks, recorders, and 14auditors in counties with fewer than 2,000,000 inhabitants 15shall be determined under this Section. The county board in 16the counties shall fix the amount of the necessary staff hire, 17stationery, fuel, and other expenses of those officers. The 18compensation of an officer shall be separate from the 19necessary staff hire, stationery, fuel, and other expenses. 20The compensation of an officer shall be equal to 80% of the 21amount paid to the State's Attorney of the officer's county. 22The officers shall be paid out of the county treasury. For 23part-time coroners, the Appendix A - County Official 24Compensation Task Force Legislative Proposal compensation 25shall be prorated based on a fraction, with the numerator   SB3621- 12 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1being the number of hours worked in the pay period and the 2denominator being the number of business days in the pay 3period times 8 hours.4    (b) The State must pay 66 2/3% of each officer's annual 5salary. Subject to appropriation, the amounts furnished by the 6State shall be payable monthly out of the Personal Property 7Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund to the county 8in which each officer is employed (i) by the State Board of 9Elections for the compensation of county clerks, recorders, 10and chief election clerks, or (ii) by the Department of 11Revenue for the compensation of county auditors, coroners and 12treasurers. The necessary staff hire, stationery, fuel, and 13other expenses, as fixed by the county board, shall be paid by 14the county.15    (c) In addition to, but separate and apart from the 16compensation provided in this Section, beginning with fiscal 17year ending on June 30, 2027, the county clerk, recorder, 18auditor, coroner, and treasurer of each county, and the chief 19clerk of each county board of election commissioners, shall 20receive a stipend in the amount of $12,800, adjusted annually 21as provided in subsection (d). The annual award, and any other 22award or stipend paid out of State funds, shall not affect any 23other compensation provided by law to be paid to county 24officers.25        (1) The total amount required for moneys paid under 26    this subsection for the county clerks, recorders, and   SB3621- 13 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1    chief election clerks shall be appropriated by the General 2    Assembly to the State Board of Elections, which shall 3    distribute the awards in annual lump sum payments to each 4    county.5        (2) The total amount required for moneys paid under 6    this subsection each year for the county auditors, 7    coroners, and treasurers shall be appropriated by the 8    General Assembly to the Department of Revenue, which shall 9    distribute the awards in annual lump sum payments to each 10    county.11        (3) The total amount required for moneys paid under 12    this subsection for the circuit court clerks each year 13    shall be appropriated by the General Assembly to the 14    Supreme Court, which shall distribute the awards in annual 15    lump sum payments to each county.16        (4) The amounts required for moneys paid under this 17    subsection shall be deposited by the county treasurer into 18    a fund dedicated for that purpose. The county payroll 19    clerk shall pay the stipend to each officer within 10 20    business days after those funds are deposited into the 21    county fund. The stipend shall not be considered part of 22    the officer's base compensation and must be paid to the 23    officer in addition to the officer's annual salary or 24    compensation. The county shall be responsible for the 25    State and federal income tax reporting and withholding, as 26    well as the employer contributions under the Illinois   SB3621- 14 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1    Pension Code, on the stipend received under this 2    subsection.3    (d) Beginning on July 1, 2027, and on July 1 of each 4subsequent year, the moneys paid under subsection subsection 5(c) shall be increased by an amount equal to the percentage 6increase, if any, in the wage and salary report information 7for state government workers and local government workers 8listed in Appendix A - County Official Compensation Task Force 9Legislative Proposal, as reported by the Bureau of Labor 10Statistics, for the 12 months ending in March of the year in 11which the increase takes place. The percentage increase shall:12        (1) determine the average wage and salary for state 13    and local government workers for the full 12 months ending 14    in March of the year in which the increase takes place;15        (2) determine the average wage and salary report 16    information for state and local government workers for the 17    full 12 months ending in March of the year immediately 18    preceding the year in which the increase takes place; and19        (3) compute the percentage increase, if any, in the 20    current-year average determined under item (1) over the 21    preceding-year average determined under item (2).22    The stipend shall be rounded to the nearest $25 increment. 23    (55 ILCS 5/4-8003 new)24    Sec. 4-8003. Officers in counties with more than 2,000,000 25inhabitants.   SB3621- 15 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1    (a) Beginning December 1, 2026, the compensation of 2coroners, county treasurers, county clerks, recorders, and 3auditors in counties with more than 2,000,000 inhabitants 4shall be determined under this Section. The county board in 5the counties shall fix the amount of the necessary staff hire, 6stationery, fuel, and other expenses of those officers. The 7compensation of an officer shall be separate from the 8necessary staff hire, stationery, fuel, and other expenses. 9The compensation of an officer shall be equal to 80% of the 10amount paid to the State's Attorney of the officer's county. 11The officers shall be paid out of the county treasury.12    (b) The State must pay 66 2/3% of each officer's annual 13salary. Subject to appropriation, the amounts furnished by the 14State shall be payable monthly out of the Personal Property 15Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund to the county 16in which each officer is employed (i) by the State Board of 17Elections for the compensation of county clerks, recorders, 18and chief election clerks, or (ii) by the Department of 19Revenue for the compensation of county auditors, coroners and 20treasurers. The necessary staff hire, stationery, fuel, and 21other expenses, as fixed by the county board, shall be paid by 22the county.23    (c) In addition to, but separate and apart from the 24compensation provided in this Section, beginning with fiscal 25year ending on June 30, 2027, the county clerk, recorder, 26auditor, coroner, and treasurer of each county, and the chief   SB3621- 16 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1clerk of each county board of election commissioners, shall 2receive a stipend in the amount of $12,800, adjusted annually 3as provided in subsection (d). The annual award, and any other 4award or stipend paid out of State funds, shall not affect any 5other compensation provided by law to be paid to county 6officers.7        (1) The total amount required for moneys paid under 8    this subsection for the county clerks, recorders, and 9    chief election clerks shall be appropriated by the General 10    Assembly to the State Board of Elections, which shall 11    distribute the awards in annual lump sum payments to each 12    county.13        (2) The total amount required for moneys paid under 14    this subsection each year for the county auditors, 15    coroners, and treasurers shall be appropriated by the 16    General Assembly to the Department of Revenue, which shall 17    distribute the awards in annual lump sum payments to each 18    county.19        (3) The total amount required for moneys paid under 20    this subsection for the circuit court clerks each year 21    shall be appropriated by the General Assembly to the 22    Supreme Court, which shall distribute the awards in annual 23    lump sum payments to each county.24        (4) The amounts required for moneys paid under this 25    subsection shall be deposited by the county treasurer into 26    a fund dedicated for that purpose. The county payroll   SB3621- 17 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1    clerk shall pay the stipend to each officer within 10 2    business days after those funds are deposited into the 3    county fund. The stipend shall not be considered part of 4    the officer's base compensation and must be paid to the 5    officer in addition to the officer's annual salary or 6    compensation. The county shall be responsible for the 7    State and federal income tax reporting and withholding, as 8    well as the employer contributions under the Illinois 9    Pension Code, on the stipend received under this 10    subsection.11    (d) Beginning on July 1, 2027, and on July 1 of each 12subsequent year, the moneys paid under subsection subsection 13(c) shall be increased by an amount equal to the percentage 14increase, if any, in the wage and salary report information 15for state government workers and local government workers 16listed in Appendix A - County Official Compensation Task Force 17Legislative Proposal, as reported by the Bureau of Labor 18Statistics, for the 12 months ending in March of the year in 19which the increase takes place. The percentage increase shall:20        (1) determine the average wage and salary for state 21    and local government workers for the full 12 months ending 22    in March of the year in which the increase takes place;23        (2) determine the average wage and salary report 24    information for state and local government workers for the 25    full 12 months ending in March of the year immediately 26    preceding the year in which the increase takes place; and  SB3621- 18 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1        (3) compute the percentage increase, if any, in the 2    current-year average determined under item (1) over the 3    preceding-year average determined under item (2).4    The stipend shall be rounded to the nearest $25 increment. 5    Section 15. The Clerks of Courts Act is amended by 6changing Section 27.3 as follows: 7    (705 ILCS 105/27.3)  (from Ch. 25, par. 27.3)8    Sec. 27.3. Compensation. 9    (a) The county board shall provide the compensation of 10Clerks of the Circuit Court, and the amount necessary for 11clerk hire, stationery, fuel and other expenses. Beginning 12December 1, 1989, the compensation per annum for Clerks of the 13Circuit Court shall be as follows:14    In counties where the population is:15Less than 14,000.......................at least $13,5001614,001-30,000..........................at least $14,5001730,001-60,000..........................at least $15,0001860,001-100,000.........................at least $15,00019100,001-200,000........................at least $16,50020200,001-300,000........................at least $18,00021300,001- 3,000,000.....................at least $20,00022Over 3,000,000.........................at least $55,00023    (b) In counties in which the population is 3,000,000 or 24less, "base salary" is the compensation paid for each Clerk of   SB3621- 19 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1the Circuit Court, respectively, before July 1, 1989.2    (c) The Clerks of the Circuit Court, in counties in which 3the population is 3,000,000 or less, shall be compensated as 4follows:5        (1) Beginning December 1, 1989, base salary plus at 6    least 3% of base salary.7        (2) Beginning December 1, 1990, base salary plus at 8    least 6% of base salary.9        (3) Beginning December 1, 1991, base salary plus at 10    least 9% of base salary.11        (4) Beginning December 1, 1992, base salary plus at 12    least 12% of base salary.13    (d) Beginning December 1, 2026, the annual compensation 14for Clerks of the Circuit Court shall be an amount equal to 80% 15of the amount paid to the State's Attorney of the clerk's 16county. The Clerks of the Circuit Court shall be paid out of 17the county treasury. The State must pay 66 2/3% of the annual 18salary. Subject to appropriation, these amounts furnished by 19the State shall be payable monthly out of the Personal 20Property Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund by 21the Supreme Court to the counties. 22    (e) In addition to the compensation provided by the county 23board, each Clerk of the Circuit Court shall receive an award 24from the State for the additional duties imposed by Sections 255-9-1 and 5-9-1.2 of the Unified Code of Corrections, Section 2610 of the Violent Crime Victims Assistance Act, and other   SB3621- 20 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1laws, in the following amount:2        (1) $3,500 per year before January 1, 1997.3        (2) $4,500 per year beginning January 1, 1997.4        (3) $5,500 per year beginning January 1, 1998.5        (4) $6,500 per year beginning January 1, 1999.6        (5) $12,800 per year beginning with fiscal year ending 7    on June 30, 2027, adjusted annually as provided in 8    subsection (g). 9The total amount required for such awards shall be 10appropriated each year by the General Assembly to the Supreme 11Court, which shall distribute such awards in annual lump sum 12payments to the Clerks of the Circuit Court in all counties. 13This annual award, and any other award or stipend paid out of 14State funds to the Clerks of the Circuit Court, shall not 15affect any other compensation provided by law to be paid to 16Clerks of the Circuit Court.17    (e) (Blank).18    (f) No county board may reduce or otherwise impair the 19compensation payable from county funds to a Clerk of the 20Circuit Court if the reduction or impairment is the result of 21the Clerk of the Circuit Court receiving an award or stipend 22payable from State funds.23    (g) Beginning on July 1, 2027, and on July 1 of each 24subsequent year, the stipend in subsection (e) shall be 25increased by an amount equal to the percentage increase, if 26any, in the wage and salary report information for State and   SB3621- 21 -LRB104 17700 RTM 31131 b1local government workers, as reported by the Bureau of Labor 2Statistics, for the 12 months ending in March of the year in 3which the increase takes place. The percentage increase shall 4be calculated as follows:5        (1) determine the average wage and salary for state 6    and local government workers for the full 12 months ending 7    in March of the year in which the increase takes place;8        (2) determine the average wage and salary report 9    information for state and local government workers for the 10    full 12 months ending in March of the year immediately 11    preceding the year in which the increase takes place; and12        (3) compute the percentage increase, if any, in the 13    current-year average determined under item (1) over the 14    preceding-year average determined under item (2).15(Source: P.A. 100-987, eff. 7-1-19.)